Maryland, session 2025, HB0471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
1–202.
A NONRESIDENT ALIEN WHO IS A CITIZEN OF A COUNTRY SUBJECT TO AN
EMBARGO UNDER THE FEDERAL INTERNATIONAL TRAFFIC IN ARMS REGULATIONS
AND LISTED UNDER 22 C.F.R. § 126.1(D)(1) OR (2), A COMMERCIAL ENTERPRISE OR
BUSINESS INCORPORATED IN A COUNTRY SUBJECT TO AN EMBARGO UNDER THE
FEDERAL INTERNATIONAL TRAFFIC IN ARMS REGULATIONS AND LISTED UNDER 22
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0471*

HOUSE BILL 471
C.F.R. § 126.1(D)(1) OR (2), AND AN INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED BY OR ASSOCIATED
WITH THE GOVERNMENT OF A COUNTRY SUBJECT TO AN EMBARGO UNDER THE
FEDERAL INTERNATIONAL TRAFFIC IN ARMS REGULATIONS AND LISTED UNDER 22
C.F.R. § 126.1(D)(1) OR (2) MAY NOT:
(1) PURCHASE AGRICULTURAL LAND, INCLUDING LAND USED FOR
RAISING LIVESTOCK, THAT IS LOCATED IN THE STATE; OR
(2) PARTICIPATE IN STATE AGRICULTURAL PROGRAMS THAT ARE
UNRELATED TO REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS FOR FOOD OR FOOD SAFETY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) This Act shall remain in effect until federal law no longer authorizes the states
to adopt and enforce provisions of the type authorized under this Act.
(b) The Department of Agriculture shall notify the Department of Legislative
Services within 5 days after the federal government enacts a law described in subsection
(a) of this section and, as of the date the law becomes effective, this Act, with no further
action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and
effect.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.